Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5283XS (2) 91 ms/js S.F. 2100 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 335.29 Industrial and commercial 1 business storage. 2 A county shall not adopt or enforce a zoning regulation 3 or other ordinance that prevents an industrial or commercial 4 business that operates or seeks to operate the business on 5 and out of property in the county but outside the corporate 6 limits of any city from storing items directly related to the 7 business, regardless of zoning designation, when all of the 8 following conditions are met: 9 1. The business uses a building to store the items. 10 2. The business does not have more than one location in the 11 county located outside the corporate limits of any city. 12 3. The business is independently owned and operated. 13 4. The business does not have more than thirty employees. 14 5. The business owns the property from which it is operating 15 and at which it is storing items. 16